dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: sortir
SFX 8C Y 70
SFX 8C r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 8C r nt/_C ir
SFX 8C r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 8C r da/_Y ir
SFX 8C r ts/_Y ir
SFX 8C r des/_Y ir
SFX 8C ortir urto/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urt/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urts/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urt/_Z ir
SFX 8C r m/_Z ir
SFX 8C r u/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urten/_Z ir
SFX 8C r a/_Z ir
SFX 8C r es/_Z ir
SFX 8C r a/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 8C r en/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8C r res/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ré/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 8C r rà/_Z ir
SFX 8C r rem/_Z ir
SFX 8C r reu/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ran/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ries/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8C r rien/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urta/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urti/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urtes/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urtis/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urta/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urti/_Z ir
SFX 8C r m/_Z ir
SFX 8C r u/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urten/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urtin/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 8C r res/_Z ir
SFX 8C r sses/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8C ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8C r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 8C ortir urt/_C ir
SFX 8C ortir urta/_D ir
SFX 8C ortir urti/_D ir
SFX 8C r m/_C ir
SFX 8C r u/_C ir
SFX 8C ortir urten/_C ir
SFX 8C ortir urtin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: subjaure
SFX 8D Y 74
SFX 8D e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 8D ure ient/_C re
SFX 8D ure gut/_v_Y re
SFX 8D ure guda/_Y re
SFX 8D ure guts/_Y re
SFX 8D ure gudes/_Y re
SFX 8D ure c/_Z re
SFX 8D re s/_Z re
SFX 8D re 0/_Z re
SFX 8D ure iem/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eim/_Z re
SFX 8D ure ieu/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eis/_Z re
SFX 8D re en/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eia/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eies/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eia/_Z re
SFX 8D aure èiem/_Z re
SFX 8D aure éiem/_Z re
SFX 8D aure èieu/_Z re
SFX 8D aure éieu/_Z re
SFX 8D aure eien/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guí/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gué/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 8D e é/_Z re
SFX 8D e às/_Z re
SFX 8D e à/_Z re
SFX 8D e em/_Z re
SFX 8D e eu/_Z re
SFX 8D e an/_Z re
SFX 8D e ia/_Z re
SFX 8D e ies/_Z re
SFX 8D e ia/_Z re
SFX 8D e íem/_Z re
SFX 8D e íeu/_Z re
SFX 8D e ien/_Z re
SFX 8D ure ga/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gues/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guis/_Z re
SFX 8D ure ga/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guem/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gueu/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guen/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guin/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gués/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guera/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guessis/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guesses/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gués/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guera/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guéssim/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guéssem/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guésseu/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 8D ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 8D ure guessen/_Z re
SFX 8D re 0/_C re
SFX 8D ure ga/_D re
SFX 8D ure gui/_D re
SFX 8D ure guem/_C re
SFX 8D ure ieu/_C re
SFX 8D aure eis/_C re
SFX 8D ure guen/_C re
SFX 8D ure guin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: teixir
SFX 8E Y 107
SFX 8E r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 8E r nt/_C ir
SFX 8E r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 8E r da/_Y ir
SFX 8E r ts/_Y ir
SFX 8E r des/_Y ir
SFX 8E ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 8E r sc/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ix/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 8E r xes/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixes/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 8E r x/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ix/_Z ir
SFX 8E r m/_Z ir
SFX 8E r u/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 8E r xen/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixen/_Z ir
SFX 8E r a/_Z ir
SFX 8E r es/_Z ir
SFX 8E r a/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 8E r en/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8E r res/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ré/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 8E r rà/_Z ir
SFX 8E r rem/_Z ir
SFX 8E r reu/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ran/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ries/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8E r rien/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 8E r sca/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixa/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixi/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 8E r sques/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixes/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixis/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 8E r sca/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixa/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixi/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 8E r m/_Z ir
SFX 8E r guem/_Z ir
SFX 8E r u/_Z ir
SFX 8E r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 8E r squen/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixen/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 8E eixir ixin/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 8E r res/_Z ir
SFX 8E r sses/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 8E r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 8E ir eix/_C ir
SFX 8E r x/_C ir
SFX 8E eixir ix/_C ir
SFX 8E ir esca/_D ir
SFX 8E r sca/_D ir
SFX 8E eixir ixa/_D ir
SFX 8E ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 8E eixir ixi/_D ir
SFX 8E ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 8E r m/_C ir
SFX 8E r guem/_C ir
SFX 8E r u/_C ir
SFX 8E ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 8E r squen/_C ir
SFX 8E eixir ixen/_C ir
SFX 8E ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 8E eixir ixin/_C ir
SFX 8E ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: tenir
SFX 8F Y 113
SFX 8F r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 8F enir indre/_v_D_Y ir
SFX 8F r nt/_C ir
SFX 8F enir ingut/_v_Y ir
SFX 8F ir gut/_v_Y ir
SFX 8F enir inguda/_Y ir
SFX 8F ir guda/_Y ir
SFX 8F enir inguts/_Y ir
SFX 8F ir guts/_Y ir
SFX 8F enir ingudes/_Y ir
SFX 8F ir gudes/_Y ir
SFX 8F enir inc/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir c/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir s/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir é/_Z ir
SFX 8F r m/_Z ir
SFX 8F r u/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir en/_Z ir
SFX 8F r a/_Z ir
SFX 8F r es/_Z ir
SFX 8F r a/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 8F r en/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguí/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guí/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gueres/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingué/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gué/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guérem/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guéreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gueren/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indré/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dré/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indràs/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dràs/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indrà/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir drà/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indrem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir drem/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indran/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dran/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indries/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dries/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indria/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dria/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indríem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dríem/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir dríeu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir indrien/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir drien/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingues/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gues/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guis/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguis/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inga/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gui/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingui/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guem/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingueu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gueu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguen/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guin/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguin/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguessis/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingueres/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguesses/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guessis/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingués/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguera/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir gués/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguéssim/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguérem/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguéssem/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guéssim/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguéreu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguésseu/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guéssiu/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguessin/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir ingueren/_Z ir
SFX 8F enir inguessen/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir guessin/_Z ir
SFX 8F ir 0/_C ir
SFX 8F enir ingues/_C ir
SFX 8F enir é/_C ir
SFX 8F enir in/_C ir
SFX 8F enir inga/_D ir
SFX 8F ir gui/_D ir
SFX 8F enir ingui/_D ir
SFX 8F enir inguem/_C ir
SFX 8F ir guem/_C ir
SFX 8F r u/_C ir
SFX 8F enir ingueu/_C ir
SFX 8F enir inguen/_C ir
SFX 8F ir guin/_C ir
SFX 8F enir inguin/_C ir
