dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.dic
desteixir/8E
entreteixir/8E
ressortir/8C
reteixir/8E
sobresortir/8C
sobreteixir/8E
sortir/8C
subjaure/8D
teixir/8E
tenir/8F
